lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX Z Y 133
SFX Z   a           i          [aeiouy¾¹èøj]a
SFX Z   a           i          [^srn]ca
SFX Z   ca          ky         [srn]ca
SFX Z   ïa          di         ïa
SFX Z   òa          ni         òa
SFX Z   »a          ti         »a
SFX Z   a           y          [^aeiouy¾¹èøcjï»ò]a
SFX Z   a           ì          [bdfmnptvw]a
SFX Z   ïa          dì         ïa
SFX Z   òa          nì         òa
SFX Z   »a          tì         »a
SFX Z   ga          ze         ga
SFX Z   cha         ¹e         cha
SFX Z   ha          ze         [^c]ha
SFX Z   ka          ce         ka
SFX Z   ra          øe         [^r]ra
SFX Z   rra         øe         rra
SFX Z   a           e          [^bdfmnptvwï»òghkr]a
SFX Z   a           u          a
SFX Z   a           o          a
SFX Z   a           ou         a
SFX Z   a           y          ea
SFX Z   a           í          [aeiouy]a
SFX Z   a           ám         a
SFX Z   a           ách        a
SFX Z   0           mi         a
SFX Z   y           ám         [^a]y
SFX Z   y           ách        [^a]y
SFX Z   y           ami        [^a]y
SFX Z   0           e          ay
SFX Z   0           i          ay
SFX Z   0           í          ay
SFX Z   0           ím         ay
SFX Z   0           ích        ay
SFX Z   0           emi        ay
SFX Z   s           da         s
SFX Z   s           dy         s
SFX Z   s           dì         s
SFX Z   s           du         s
SFX Z   s           do         s
SFX Z   s           dou        s
SFX Z   s           dám        s
SFX Z   s           dách       s
SFX Z   s           dami       s
SFX Z   e           i          [^g]e
SFX Z   e           í          [^g]e
SFX Z   e           ím         [^g]e
SFX Z   e           ích        [^g]e
SFX Z   0           mi         [^g]e
SFX Z   ì           i          ì
SFX Z   ì           í          ì
SFX Z   ì           ím         ì
SFX Z   ì           ích        ì
SFX Z   0           mi         ì
SFX Z   ge          ¾i         dge
SFX Z   ge          ¾í         dge
SFX Z   ge          ¾ím        dge
SFX Z   ge          ¾ích       dge
SFX Z   ge          ¾emi       dge
SFX Z   eò          nì         [^aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   eò          ni         [^aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   eò          ní         [^aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   eò          ním        [^aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   eò          ních       [^aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   eò          nìmi       [^aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   ò           nì         [aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   ò           ni         [aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   ò           ní         [aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   ò           ním        [aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   ò           ních       [aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   ò           nìmi       [aeioyì]seò
SFX Z   eò          nì         [^løs]eò
SFX Z   eò          ni         [^løs]eò
SFX Z   eò          ní         [^løs]eò
SFX Z   eò          ním        [^løs]eò
SFX Z   eò          ních       [^løs]eò
SFX Z   eò          nìmi       [^løs]eò
SFX Z   ò           nì         [lø]eò
SFX Z   ò           ni         [lø]eò
SFX Z   ò           ní         [lø]eò
SFX Z   ò           ním        [lø]eò
SFX Z   ò           ních       [lø]eò
SFX Z   ò           nìmi       [lø]eò
SFX Z   ev          ve         ev
SFX Z   ev          vi         ev
SFX Z   ev          ví         ev
SFX Z   ev          vím        ev
SFX Z   ev          vích       ev
SFX Z   ev          vemi       ev
SFX Z   ec          ce         [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          ci         [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cí         [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cím        [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cích       [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cemi       [^lp]ec
SFX Z   0           e          [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           i          [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           í          [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           ím         [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           ích        [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           emi        [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           e          [jlptxzè¹ø¾]
SFX Z   0           i          [jlmptxzè¹ø¾]
SFX Z   0           í          [jlmptxzè¹ø¾]
SFX Z   0           ím         [jlmptxzè¹ø¾]
SFX Z   0           ích        [jlmptxzè¹ø¾]
SFX Z   0           emi        [jlmptxzè¹ø¾]
SFX Z   0           ì          em
SFX Z   0           ìmi        em
SFX Z   0           e          [^e][cmv]
SFX Z   0           i          [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           í          [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           ím         [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           ích        [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           emi        [^e][cv]
SFX Z   ò           nì         [^e]ò
SFX Z   ò           ni         [^e]ò
SFX Z   ò           ní         [^e]ò
SFX Z   ò           ním        [^e]ò
SFX Z   ò           ních       [^e]ò
SFX Z   ò           nìmi       [^e]ò
SFX Z   »           tì         »
SFX Z   »           ti         »
SFX Z   »           tí         »
SFX Z   »           tím        »
SFX Z   »           tích       »
SFX Z   »           tìmi       »
SFX Z   ï           dì         ï
SFX Z   ï           di         ï
SFX Z   ï           dí         ï
SFX Z   ï           dím        ï
SFX Z   ï           dích       ï
SFX Z   ï           dìmi       ï
