lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
acetolýza/ZQ
adresace/Z
afghánątina/ZQ
agogika/ZQ
akademie/Z
akumulace/Z
alergologie/Z
allotransplantace/Z
Amálie/Z
amnesie/Z
anarchokomunistka/ZQ
anemie/Z
Anička/ZQ
anténka/ZQ
Antiochie/Z
apanáľ/Z
Arábie/Z
archivářka/ZQ
arteterapie/Z
asociativita/ZQ
Asýrie/Z
audience/Z
autoafektace/Z
autolakovna/ZQ
autosluľba/ZQ
axioloľka/ZQ
bačkorka/ZQ
bakteroloľka/ZQ
bandoneonistka/ZQ
Barmánka/ZQ
baątýřka/ZQ
bedla/ZQ
bělka/ZQ
berneąka/ZQ
bezručka/ZQ
bilabiála/ZQ
biografie/Z
biorytmologie/Z
blastula/ZQ
boa/ZQ
boka/ZQ
Borovnička/ZQ
bradavka/ZQ
Bretaň/Z
broučkiáda/ZQ
břekyně/ZQ
Bukovka/ZQ
bylina/ZQ
castristka/ZQ
centralistka/ZQ
cigánka/ZQ
Cislajtanie/Z
conquista/ZQ
cykloturistika/ZQ
čarodějka/ZQ
čepice/ZQ
čičorka/ZQ
čmouha/ZQ
čtyřaktovka/ZQ
Dácie/Z
Darina/ZQ
debutantka/ZQ
defragmentace/Z
deklarantka/ZQ
delokalizace/Z
demontáľ/Z
depistáľ/Z
desetidolarovka/ZQ
detailizace/Z
devíza/ZQ
diagonála/ZQ
difrakce/Z
dipozice/ZQ
disparita/ZQ
divize/Z
Dobruąka/ZQ
doktorandka/ZQ
donkichotiáda/ZQ
dovrąitelka/ZQ
draslovka/ZQ
droga/ZQ
drvoątěpka/ZQ
dubohabřina/ZQ
dvacetiminutovka/ZQ
dvojtečka/ZQ
dýmnice/ZQ
ebonologie/Z
ekonomie/Z
elektroda/ZQ
elevace/Z
emocionalita/ZQ
entomoloľka/ZQ
erekce/Z
estakáda/ZQ
etnomuzikoloľka/ZQ
Evelína/ZQ
existencialistka/ZQ
expodnikatelka/ZQ
fabrička/ZQ
fángle/Z
Fatra/ZQ
fenoloxigenáza/ZQ
Filadelfie/Z
finątina/ZQ
florbalistka/ZQ
formace/Z
fotogalerie/Z
fragmentace/Z
frekventantka/ZQ
funkcionalita/ZQ
fyzioterapeutka/ZQ
galvanotechnika/ZQ
gazela/ZQ
geologie/Z
Gisela/ZQ
gnose/Z
granda/ZQ
Guinejka/ZQ
hadimrąka/ZQ
hanba/ZQ
Havana/ZQ
hemolymfa/ZQ
hibernace/Z
hlasistka/ZQ
hluchota/ZQ
Holanďanka/ZQ
homologace/Z
hospitalisace/Z
houľev/Z
Hrčava/ZQ
hřebíkárna/ZQ
huriska/ZQ
hydrogenace/Z
hyperaktivace/Z
hypotenze/Z
chatka/ZQ
chmurka/ZQ
chráněnka/ZQ
chuligánka/ZQ
identifikace/Z
iluze/Z
imunohistochemie/Z
induktance/Z
iniciativa/ZQ
institucionalizace/Z
interjekce/Z
intuice/ZQ
iredentistka/ZQ
Ithaka/ZQ
jádrovina/ZQ
Jarka/ZQ
jednice/ZQ
jeřabina/ZQ
jímka/ZQ
jízdenka/ZQ
Julinka/ZQ
Kadaň/Z
kalamajka/ZQ
kambala/ZQ
kanálka/ZQ
kapénka/ZQ
kapsulka/ZQ
Karenina/ZQ
kartounka/ZQ
Katařanka/ZQ
kavalírka/ZQ
keratektomie/Z
klaka/ZQ
Kleopatra/ZQ
klíą»ky/ZQ
kniha/ZQ
koexistence/Z
kolbenka/ZQ
koloběľka/ZQ
komediantka/ZQ
komplementarita/ZQ
koncese/Z
kongregace/Z
konstanta/ZQ
kontrarevoluce/Z
konzerva/ZQ
koprovka/ZQ
koroptev/Z
kosmonautka/ZQ
kotelna/ZQ
koza/ZQ
kraksna/ZQ
kravinka/ZQ
kriminalistika/ZQ
krosna/ZQ
krypta/ZQ
kříľala/ZQ
kuchařinka/ZQ
kuna/ZQ
kuřavka/ZQ
kvartetistka/ZQ
kyfóza/ZQ
laborantka/ZQ
lakota/ZQ
laoątina/ZQ
latina/ZQ
lednice/ZQ
lektorka/ZQ
letargie/Z
liána/ZQ
Libyjka/ZQ
liliputánka/ZQ
lisovna/ZQ
livrej/Z
lokace/Z
louč/Z
lucerna/ZQ
lustrace/Z
lyľe/Z
magie/Z
majorizace/Z
malajątina/ZQ
malůvka/ZQ
Mánička/ZQ
marasca/ZQ
marodka/ZQ
mastičkářka/ZQ
matička/ZQ
mazanina/ZQ
mechanička/ZQ
meningitida/ZQ
metakritika/ZQ
metráľ/Z
míčovna/ZQ
mikroinstrukce/Z
milicionářka/ZQ
miniaturistka/ZQ
miriáda/ZQ
mládeľnice/ZQ
mobilizace/Z
Mohelka/ZQ
monografie/Z
moréna/ZQ
motivace/Z
mrcha/ZQ
mulatka/ZQ
muzikologie/Z
myąička/ZQ
nádenice/ZQ
nadtřída/ZQ
nálada/ZQ
náplň/Z
Nasavrky/ZQ
nauka/ZQ
Nebraska/ZQ
nemocnička/ZQ
nervóza/ZQ
neuropsychologie/Z
Nigeřanka/ZQ
nizozemątina/ZQ
normohodina/ZQ
novinařina/ZQ
nulita/ZQ
obětiątě/ZQ
obleva/ZQ
obryně/ZQ
octomilka/ZQ
odlévárna/ZQ
odřezávačka/ZQ
oftalmologie/Z
okarína/ZQ
Oleąenka/ZQ
omítačka/ZQ
opatrovnice/ZQ
opra»/Z
organela/ZQ
ortografie/Z
osmdesátnice/ZQ
ostroretka/ZQ
otočka/ZQ
ozdoba/ZQ
padesátnice/ZQ
paleontoloľka/ZQ
pandľábątina/ZQ
papírka/ZQ
paraplegie/Z
paroľnatka/ZQ
pásovka/ZQ
paternalistka/ZQ
pavěda/ZQ
pečovatelka/ZQ
penalizace/Z
perfekcionistka/ZQ
permanentka/ZQ
perverze/Z
pětina/ZQ
pícka/ZQ
pilnice/ZQ
píseň/Z
piľmovka/ZQ
plasma/KZQ
plejáda/ZQ
plnička/ZQ
plynárna/ZQ
poděbradka/ZQ
podnabídka/ZQ
podsí»/Z
poetizace/Z
pointa/ZQ
Polanka/ZQ
polka/ZQ
poloąvestka/ZQ
pomlka/ZQ
populistka/ZQ
pořadatelka/ZQ
postýlka/ZQ
potvrzenka/ZQ
pozemą»anka/ZQ
pragmatistka/ZQ
praslovanątina/ZQ
prebenda/ZQ
presumpce/Z
probírka/ZQ
prohlíľečka/ZQ
promlka/ZQ
prosévačka/ZQ
protialiance/Z
protuberance/Z
průduąnice/ZQ
prvouka/ZQ
přednice/ZQ
přeformulace/Z
přepona/ZQ
přezdívka/ZQ
příloľka/ZQ
přispěvatelka/ZQ
pseudosféra/ZQ
psychopatoloľka/ZQ
puklina/ZQ
pupava/ZQ
raabizace/Z
radiostanice/ZQ
rachota/ZQ
Raspenava/ZQ
reaustenitizace/Z
reedice/ZQ
rehelénizace/Z
rekordmanka/ZQ
reminiscence/Z
replika/ZQ
respondentka/ZQ
revise/Z
ribosa/ZQ
rohovina/ZQ
Romka/ZQ
routka/ZQ
rozkrývka/ZQ
Rozsíčka/ZQ
rudoarmějka/ZQ
rusovláska/ZQ
rybička/ZQ
rytířka/ZQ
řepa/ZQ
Sába/ZQ
Salvadořanka/ZQ
samozásobitelka/ZQ
satisfakce/Z
scénáristka/ZQ
sebeobsluha/ZQ
sedmačka/ZQ
sekerka/ZQ
sémioloľka/ZQ
septikémie/Z
severoameričanka/ZQ
schůzka/ZQ
Silvie/Z
sitáristka/ZQ
skazka/ZQ
sklovina/ZQ
skříň/Z
Slavia/ZQ
slíva/ZQ
sloľka/ZQ
smetanka/ZQ
sněmovna/ZQ
Sodoma/ZQ
sonatina/ZQ
soupiska/ZQ
spařovačka/ZQ
spiritistka/ZQ
spoludrľitelka/ZQ
sportovkyně/ZQ
srbocharvátątina/ZQ
Stanislava/ZQ
stavařka/ZQ
stereoskopie/Z
stojina/ZQ
stranička/ZQ
strouhanka/ZQ
střemcha/ZQ
Studnice/ZQ
subkomponenta/ZQ
sugestibilita/ZQ
superplasticita/ZQ
svačina/ZQ
světlovláska/ZQ
svobodnice/ZQ
syndikalizace/Z
systemizace/Z
©árka/ZQ
©eherezáda/ZQ
ąibalka/ZQ
ąkála/ZQ
ąkvírečka/ZQ
ąňůra/ZQ
ąpína/ZQ
ątěnice/ZQ
ątolba/ZQ
ąvejkovina/ZQ
tajenka/ZQ
tara/ZQ
teatralistika/ZQ
televise/Z
teploléčba/ZQ
termoelektrotechnika/ZQ
textilka/ZQ
Timořanka/ZQ
tlačenka/ZQ
tonalita/ZQ
toskánątina/ZQ
trakce/Z
transpozice/ZQ
trepanace/Z
trikolóra/ZQ
trosečnice/ZQ
trľnice/ZQ
třicetina/ZQF
tubička/ZQ
tuľba/ZQ
Tyrolka/ZQ
ufoloľka/ZQ
ukolébavka/ZQ
únava/ZQ
úpravna/ZQ
uschovatelka/ZQ
uvaděčka/ZQ
vafle/Z
valuace/Z
vaskularizace/Z
věcička/ZQ
velerada/ZQ
venetątina/ZQ
Věruąka/ZQ
větička/ZQ
videokamera/ZQ
Vilma/ZQ
virtualizace/Z
vizáľ/Z
vlasovka/ZQ
voda/ZQ
volitelka/ZQ
vrána/Z
vřetenuąka/ZQ
vycpávka/ZQ
vychlípenina/ZQ
výluka/ZQ
vyráľka/ZQ
vystřihovánka/ZQ
vyvaľovačka/ZQ
vzducholoď/ZI
Yvona/ZQ
záhumenka/ZQ
záloľka/ZQ
zápraľka/ZQ
zastávka/ZQ
zavářka/ZQ
zbrojnice/ZQ
zelinka/ZQ
zkazka/ZQ
zmijovka/ZQ
zpátečka/ZQ
zrzohlávka/ZQ
zvláątnůstka/ZQ
ľánristka/ZQ
ľemlička/ZQ
ľirafa/ZQ
®ofka/ZQ
